Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.871

Merger—Not effective within sixty days—Transfer restrictions.

(1) If the proposed merger does not become effective within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment, the limited partnership shall release any transfer restrictions imposed as permitted by RCW 25.10.861.

(2) If, after releasing transfer restrictions, the proposed merger becomes effective, the limited partnership must send a new dissenters' notice as provided in RCW 25.10.841(2) and 25.10.851 and repeat the payment demand procedure.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1209.]